Nebraska, session 109, LB582.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB582 LB582
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3012 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this
section, a tax is hereby imposed and levied, in the amount and in
accordance with this section, upon the net operating revenue of all cash
devices operating within the State of Nebraska for profit or gain either
directly or indirectly received. The tax shall be paid in the amount and
manner specified in this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section,
beginning on and after July 1, 2025, any distributor of a cash device,
and any operator of a cash device if the operator is not subject to a
revenue-sharing or other agreement with a distributor who is paying the
tax, shall pay a tax for each cash device in operation each calendar
quarter during the taxable year. The tax shall be collected by the
department and due and payable on January 1, April 1, July 1, and October
1 of each year on each cash device in operation during the preceding
calendar quarter. For each cash device put into operation on a date
subsequent to a quarterly due date that has not been included in
computing the tax imposed and levied by the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act, the tax shall be due and payable on the immediately succeeding
quarterly due date.
(3) The amount of the tax imposed and levied under this section
shall be fifteen five percent of the net operating revenue for each cash
device. The quarterly tax shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner documenting the total gross and net operating revenue
for that quarter.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall remit the taxes collected pursuant to
this section to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:
(a) Five Twenty percent to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund for
enforcement of the act and maintenance of the central server;
(b) Two and one-half percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance
-2-

LB582 LB582
2025 2025
Fund;
(c) Twenty Two and one-half percent to the General Fund;
(d) Forty-seven and one-half percent to the Education Future Fund
Ten percent to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund;
(e) Seventeen and one-half Forty percent to the Property Tax Credit
Cash Fund; and
(f) The remaining seven and one-half twenty-five percent to the
county treasurer of the county in which the cash device is located to be
distributed as follows: (i) If the cash device is located completely
within an unincorporated area of a county, the remaining seven and one-
half twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the county in which the
cash device is located, or (ii) if the cash device is located within the
limits of a city or village in such county, one-half of the remaining
seven and one-half twenty-five percent shall be distributed to such
county and one-half of the remaining seven and one-half twenty-five
percent shall be distributed to the city or village in which such cash
device is located.
(5) This section does not apply to cash devices operated by a
fraternal benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072
to 44-10,109 or a recognized veterans organization as defined in section
80-401.01.
Sec. 2. Section 81-3729, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3729 The Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund is
hereby created. The fund shall consist of revenue submitted by vendors
and retailers under section 81-3728 and revenue from the tax collected on
the net operating revenue of cash devices pursuant to section 77-3012.
Revenue from the sale of advertising shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the fund. The commission shall use the fund to
carry out its purposes under the Nebraska Visitors Development Act. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
-3-

LB582 LB582
2025 2025
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Original section 81-3729, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-4-